Nebraska, session 109, LB1050A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1050A LB1050A
2026 2026
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $850,000 from the
General Fund for FY2026-27 and (2) $800,000 from the General Fund for
FY2027-28 to the State Department of Education, for Program 25, to aid in
carrying out the provisions of Legislative Bill 1050, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems
for state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this
section.
Sec. 2. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-2-